District of Columbia statutes.
6-1207

Appropriations to carry out § 6-1206.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of § 6-1206, there are authorized to be appropriated to the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary.

Sept. 21, 1966, 80 Stat. 830, Pub. L. 89-600, § 2
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1938, Pub. L. 91-650, title VII, § 701
1981 Ed., § 5-1107.
1973 Ed., § 5-807.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Preservation of Residential Neighborhoods Against Nuisances Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-209, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR ).
For temporary addition, see § 2 of the Preservation of Residential Neighborhoods Against Nuisances Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-352, August 12, 1996, 43 DCR 4626), and § 2 of the Preservation of Residential Neighborhoods Against Nuisances Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-412, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6068).